Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1616
Inaugural authorization to operate; provisional authorization to operate; when applicable.

A school not yet in operation when its application for authorization to operate is filed may not begin operation until receipt of authorization. The authorization shall be an inaugural authorization valid for one year and upon showing to the satisfaction of the commissioner that it has fully complied with sections 85-1611 to 85-1615, the school will be eligible for a regular authorization. The commissioner may issue provisional authorization to operate containing such limitations as to time, procedures, functions, or other conditions as the commissioner may deem necessary.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 17;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 16;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2817;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 16.